THE 

ECONOMIC 

IMPACT  OF 

2010
VANCOUVER,  CANADA,  WINTER  OLYMPICS  ON 
OREGON  AND  THE  PACIFIC  NORTHWEST

THE 

S.  HRG.  109–472

FIELD  HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TRADE, TOURISM, AND 

ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

AUGUST  5,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

28–349 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  TRADE,  TOURISM,  AND  ECONOMIC  DEVELOPMENT 

GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota,  Ranking 
DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on August 5, 2005 .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Burnes, Jane, Director, British Columbia 2010 Olympic Winter Games Secre-
tariat .....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Davidson, Todd, Director, Oregon Tourism Commission .....................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Mahalic, Drew, CEO, Oregon Sports Authority ....................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Riley, Dave, Vice President/General Manager, Mt. Hood Meadows Ski Resort .
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Wilgus,  Carl,  State  Tourism  Director,  Idaho  Division  of  Tourism  Develop-
ment ......................................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Page 
1
1

2
4
8
10
18
20
13
16

24
27

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

THE  ECONOMIC 

2010
VANCOUVER,  CANADA,  WINTER  OLYMPICS 
ON  OREGON  AND  THE  PACIFIC  NORTHWEST 

IMPACT  OF  THE 

FRIDAY,  AUGUST  5,  2005

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TRADE, TOURISM, AND ECONOMIC 
DEVELOPMENT, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  at  the
Oregon  Sports  Hall  of  Fame,  Hon.  Gordon  H.  Smith,  Chairman  of 
Subcommittee, presiding. 

Portland, OR. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF GORDON H. SMITH,

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator  SMITH.  I’ll  call  to  order  the  official  hearing  of  the  U.S. 
Senate  Commerce  Committee,  and  I  chair  the  Senate  Sub-
committee on Trade, Tourism, and Economic Development. 

This  is  a  field  hearing.  Obviously,  it  is  official,  but  we  will  keep 
it  somewhat  informal  because  we  are  focusing  today  on  an  oppor-
tunity  that  Oregon  has,  because  our  neighbor,  Canada,  specifically 
British  Columbia  and  Vancouver,  will  be  hosting  the  2010  Winter 
Olympics, and the Paralympic Winter Games. It will have an enor-
mous  impact  on  the  larger  region,  which  is  obviously  the  states  of 
Washington and Oregon. 

Today  we’ll  hear  testimony  regarding  the  economic  and  tourism 
potential  that  benefits  Oregon  and  what  it’s  likely  to  derive  from 
these Games. 

The  testimony  will  also  include  suggested  recommendations  for 
promoting  a  cooperative  relationship  between  Oregon  and  British 
Columbia in preparation for these Games. 

We  will  learn  how  past  international  sporting  events,  including 
the 2002 Salt Lake City Winter Olympics, allowed neighboring cit-
ies  and  states  to  capitalize  on  the  tourism  industry  and  how  the 
State  of  Oregon  can  help  mobilize  on  its  efforts  to  attract  visitors 
to Oregon before, during, and after the Games. 

Host cities of Olympic Games have experienced large increases in 
revenue as a direct result of the Games. The exposure of these cit-
ies  has  resulted  in  positive  economic  impacts,  not  only  to  the  host 
cities,  but  also  to  the  surrounding  areas.  It  is  expected  that  the 
2010 Winter Games will result in increased revenues for all of our 
neighboring states, including Idaho, which I think was a significant 
beneficiary of the Salt Lake Winter Olympics. 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

2

Oregon is in a unique position to increase its exposure to tourists 

and corporate investors notably during the Games. 

But in the few years to follow, I want to make sure we take full 
advantage  of  any  potential  tourism  boosts  to  our  state.  Tourism  is 
the  third  fastest  growing  industry  in  Oregon.  This  is  due,  in  part, 
to the nonstop air service to Germany, Japan, Mexico, and Canada. 
In 2004 alone, tourism generated $6.9 billion to Oregon. So with 
Vancouver,  British  Columbia,  just  300  miles  away,  Oregon  and 
Portland  are  in  a  very  positive  place  to  reap  the  benefits  of  eco-
nomic and tourist activity from these 2010 Games. 

I  would  like  to  especially  welcome  Consul  General  Jeffrey 
Parker,  who  is  here  today  on  behalf  of  the  Government  of  Canada 
as our special guest. 

I  thank  you  for  your  interest.  In  today’s  hearing  I  hope  Canada 
will  continue  to  work  in  close  partnership  with  Oregon  and  its 
other Northwest neighbors as you prepare for the 2010 Games. 

I would also like to thank all the witnesses for being here today. 
Your  comments  are  very  important  to  the  U.S.  Senate  and  to  the 
state of Oregon, and your full statements will certainly be included 
in the record. 

Again, this will be somewhat of an informal hearing, but we will 
learn much from your experience and help focus Oregon on the op-
portunities  that  you  and  your  2010  Games  will  make  available  to 
us. 

So we will first hear from Ms. Jane Burnes, Director, British Co-
lumbia  2010  Olympic  Winter  Games  Secretariat.  She  is  from  Vic-
toria, British Columbia, and I thank you very much, Jane, for your 
presence here. 

We’ll hand you the mike first and hear from you. 

STATEMENT OF JANE BURNES, DIRECTOR, BRITISH 

COLUMBIA 2010 OLYMPIC WINTER GAMES SECRETARIAT 
Ms.  BURNES.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator,  and  good  morning 
everyone.  I  really  appreciate  the  opportunity  of  being  here  today 
and  talking  about  both  the  Olympic  and  Paralympic  venture  that 
our entire region has embarked upon. 

For me it’s been almost five years that I’ve been working on this 
project.  It’s  been  exciting  and  very  much  a  learning  experience  for 
myself,  for  all  of  the  members  of  our  team,  all  of  the  government 
partners,  and  the  many  businesses  and  organizations  that  we’ve 
worked with in putting our successful bid together. 

From the outset, Vancouver’s bid for the 2010 Winter Games was 
based  on  creating  legacies:  economic  and  tourism  legacies,  sports 
and health, social and sustainability legacies. 

The  official  support  for  our  bid  from  all  the  states  in  the  Pacific 
Northwest  and  the  Pacific  Northwest  Economic  Region,  the 
PNWER organizations, were really important for us to demonstrate 
just how important their shared legacies would be. 

First  of  all,  I  want  to  just  give  you  a  quick  update  on  the  Van-
couver 2010 Games and then an update on a couple of the business 
activities that the Province is undertaking and then a comment on 
the tourism impact for the Pacific Northwest. 

I  don’t  think  I’ll  ever  forget  that  day  in  Prague,  July  2,  2003.  I 
was seated right behind Wayne Gretzky as the announcement was 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

3

made  that  we  were  to  win  the  Games.  And  it  was  just  an  out-
pouring of celebration, of course, from the team over in Prague, and 
also in Vancouver. 

And that weekend we counted the border visitors across from the 
U.S. It was the highest number of border visitors that we ever had 
on  a  Dominion  Day,  Canada  Day,  and  the  July  4th  weekend,  so 
that  in  itself  was  a  remarkable  demonstration  of  just  how  impor-
tant  this  is  to  tourism  and  for  the  common  things  that  we  share. 
Since  July  2,  2003,  we’ve  put  together  a  team.  The  Vancouver 
Organizing Committee now has about 120 people working on staff, 
and it’s focused on the planning, venue construction, and the spon-
sorships.  The  venues  we  plan  to  have  ready  2  years  in  advance  of 
the Games so that we’ll be able to test them all out and make sure 
that they’re running on schedule. 

Our sponsorships are going well, and we’ve signed up five major 

national partners, to date. 

Many  of  the  lessons  that  we  learned  in  terms  of  being  ahead  of 
the curve we picked up from people who had run the Games in the 
past,  and  especially  the  wonderful  opportunity  we  had  to  benefit 
from the people working on the Games in Salt Lake. That was just 
very, very fortunate for us, and we’re most grateful for the informa-
tion  shared  generously,  not  just  during  the  Games,  but  after  as 
well,  as  people  took  time  out  to  share  their  experience  and  help 
make sure that ours was going to win and succeed in the end. 

So  I  would  say  that  Vancouver  2010,  although  in  the  formative 

stages, is right on schedule. 

In  the  government,  we’re  very  focused  on  ensuring  that  the  in-
vestment  that  we’ve  made,  both  the  provincial  and  federal  invest-
ment, is going to result in legacies for all Canadians, all British Co-
lumbians,  and,  of  course,  the  accelerated  legacies  that  we  hope  to 
have for the entire region. 

In British Columbia, once again, the lessons that we’ve picked up 
from  places  like  Salt  Lake  and  Sydney  show  that  the  sooner  you 
begin  your  business  activities,  the  better  off  you  are.  And  that’s 
why  we  began  during  the  bid  phase  in  the  anticipation  of  winning 
and being able to leverage those further. 

We’ve  set  up  a  website—and  that’s  really  our  main  center  of  ac-
tivity now for business—which talks about direct opportunities that 
come from the Games and venue construction, and the actual oper-
ations  and  sponsorships,  and  from  looking  at  venue  opportunities. 
Talking  about  the  experience  that  you’ve  had  working  with  the 
Olympics  means  that  you’re  qualified,  then,  to  carry  on  and  work 
with other ones in the future. 

Major  infrastructure  projects,  which  as  you  know  from  your 
country’s  experience  in  Games  that  you’ve  hosted,  always  go  hand 
in hand with the Games that you’ve put on. 

We’re  going  to  be  expanding  our  highway  to  Whistler—I  hope 
lots  of  you  have  had  the  opportunity  of  driving  on  it  and  taking  a 
ski  or  golf  trip  up  to  Whistler—and  also  the  expansion  of  some  of 
our  rapid  transit  up  to  the  airport  to  ensure  that  we  are  ready  to 
welcome the rest of the world and the infrastructure is in place. 

It’s major sporting events, too. Just as athletes and officials gath-
ered  around  the  Salt  Lake  Games,  we’re  finding  that  they’re  com-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

4

ing  to  Vancouver  to  look  at  those  venues  and  in  advance  get  used 
to what it is that we have to offer. 

On  our  website  we  have  information  about  all  of  this  that  we 
share  with  businesses  so  that  they’ll  be  able  to  take  advantage  of 
those. 

Now, just a quick comment on the tourism impact on the Pacific 
Northwest. Earlier today, before this hearing began, a reporter was 
in  and  said  he  wasn’t  able  to  stay  for  long  and  could  I  talk  about 
what the biggest impact would be. It’s tourism. It really is. I mean, 
we can talk about how important sustainability in the environment 
is,  how  critical  it  is  for  sports  and  our  community,  education,  vol-
unteers,  all  of  those  opportunities  and  legacies  that  we’ll  be  build-
ing. 

But  tourism  for  our  region  is  really  key,  as  the  Senator  referred 
to  in  his  opening  remarks.  We  expect  that  there  will  be  incre-
mental  spending  in  addition  over  the  4-year  period  of  $1.5  billion. 
We’re  expecting  that  the  Pacific  Northwest  and  the  other  parts  of 
the U.S. are going to be sending well over 50 percent of the visitors 
to our Games themselves. Yes, we’ll be welcoming overseas visitors, 
but  our  neighbors  will  be  coming.  And  we  expect  that  to  be  a  two-
way process. 

We’ve  always  talked  about  the  Circle  Tours  and  the  Hands 
Across the Border. It’s transparent, as we know, in our region. And 
through the Pacific Northwest Economic Region we hope to be cap-
italizing on this and working together to help us all benefit. 

The Games are huge. I’ve been so fortunate to be involved in this 
adventure,  to  meet  the  wonderful  people  in  other  countries  that 
have put them on. 

And we’re really creating for our entire region a glass that’s half 
full. It’s up to all of us, through our respective organizations, juris-
dictions,  and  our  commitments,  to  work  together  to  fill  that  glass 
up to the top, to create legacies, opportunities, and an international 
profile that will last for years and years to come. 

I think the most inspiring remarks I’ve ever heard—and I’ve lis-
tened  to  a  lot  of  politicians,  Senator—came  from  Governor  Leavitt 
after  Utah  hosted  the  Games.  He  was  kind  enough  to  come  up  to 
Vancouver and address a business crowd of over a thousand people. 
There  wasn’t  a  dry  eye  in  the  house  at  the  end  of  it,  as  he  told  us 
about  his  Olympic  adventure  and  what  it  meant  to  the  future  of 
his state and the city of Salt Lake. 

That’s  what  we  want  to  create  with  these  Games,  and  we  want 
to do it with the entire region, so thank you so much for including 
us today. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Burnes follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JANE BURNES, DIRECTOR, BRITISH COLUMBIA 2010 

OLYMPIC WINTER GAMES SECRETARIAT 

Update on Vancouver 2010 Games 

From  the  outset,  Vancouver’s  bid  for  the  2010  Winter  Games  was  based  on  cre-
ating  legacies—economic  and  tourism,  sports  and  health,  social  and  sustainability. 
The  official  support  for  our  bid  from  the  Pacific  Northwest  states,  and  the  Pacific 
Northwest  Economic  Region  (PNWER),  was  very  much  appreciated  and  helped  us 
realize the legacies we achieve will be shared beyond our borders. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

5

Since  July  2,  2003,  when  the  IOC  awarded  Vancouver  the  right  to  host  the  2010 
Games,  the  Vancouver  Organizing  Committee  (VANOC)  has  been,  a  20-member 
board was appointed, and Jack Poole has been appointed chair of the board. 

Led by president and chief operating officer John Furlong, the VANOC team now 

numbers 120 people and is organized into eight key areas:

—Services and Planning 
—Sport 
—Finance 
—Venue Development 
—Revenue, Marketing and Communications 
—Legal 
—Human Resources 
—Technology and Systems

• The  main  focus  now  is  Games’  planning,  venue  construction  and  sponsorships.
• VANOC’s  goal  is  to  deliver  the  venues  two  years  ahead  of  the  Games  in  order 
to allow for testing the venues in advance of the Games and providing athletes 
with  training  opportunities.  This  goal  is  supported  by  diligent  planning,  com-
prehensive environmental approvals, and an early start to construction.

• Overall, domestic sponsorships, merchandise and supplier programs are to gen-
erate  about  40  percent  of  the  Games  Operating  Budget.  The  rest  of  the  budget 
comes  from  the  sale  of  television  broadcast  rights,  international  sponsorships 
and ticket sales.

• VANOC’s  marketing  efforts  have  resulted  in  five  major  National  Partners  to 

date: Bell Canada, RBC Financial Group, Hbc, RONA and Petro-Canada.

Update on Province of British Columbia 2010-Related Business Activities 

British Columbia’s investment in the 2010 Games has led to a concerted effort to 
build  upon  lessons  learned  from  past  experiences,  such  as  the  Salt  Lake  Games  in 
2002,  in  an  attempt  to  leverage  this  unique  opportunity  for  our  region.  It  has  been 
widely acknowledged that starting early increases the chance of achieving a signifi-
cant economic impact. 

The Province’s main vehicle to help business participate in the 2010 Winter Olym-
pic  and  Paralympic  Games  is  the  2010  Commerce  Centre,  which  can  be  found  at 
www.2010CommerceCentre.gov.bc.ca.

While economic impact studies have shown the Games will bring an estimated $4 
billion  of  business  activity,  related  activities  will  add  much  more  to  the  equation. 
The 2010 Commerce Centre will aggregate and display all 2010-related business op-
portunities including:

• Direct Opportunities such as venue construction ($470 million+), VANOC Oper-

ations ($1.3 billion), BC Secretariat and 2010 Legacies Now;

• Olympic  Family  Opportunities  such  as  procurement  from  sponsors  like  Bell 

Canada $200 million, Royal Bank $110 million;

• Major Infrastructure Projects such as the Vancouver Convention Centre Expan-
sion  Project  ($565  million),  new  Rapid  Transit  Line  ($1.7  billion),  YVR  expan-
sion ($1.4 billion); and

• Major  Sporting  Events  and  Sports  Venue  Construction:  World  Junior  Hockey 
2006,  North  American  Indigenous  Games  2008,  World  Police  and  Fire  Games 
2009, Northern Sports Centre Prince George, Paralympic Training Centre Kim-
berley, Speed Skating Oval Fort St. John.

that fit your profile 

Registration at the 2010 Commerce Centre site is free and it allows one can:
• Browse and search current business opportunities 
• Procedures for bidding on Olympic projects 
• Complimentary registration for e-mail notification of procurement opportunities 
• Listings of 2010-related bid winners 
• Steps to becoming a sub-contractor to winning suppliers 
• Strategies for potential product licensees 
• Online procurement workshop material and calendar of events 
• Success stories and best practice advice 
• Business planning, Olympic logo use and guidelines 
• 2010 business news 
• Sign-up for 2010 Commerce Centre electronic newsletter

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

6

Future Provincial plans include a 2010 Business Network, anticipated to be oper-

ational later this year. It will include:

tential partners, suppliers and new clients.

• A database of companies that want to do Olympic business.
• An  opportunity  for  companies  to  build  new  business  relationships—to  find  po-
• Ability for companies, including international firms, to post a detailed business 
profile  and  search  listings  to  find  the  business  relationships  they  need  to  do 
business around the Games.

Comment on Tourism Impact for Pacific Northwest 

vestment.

to British Columbia during 2008–2012.

(U.S. and Overseas) visitors to British Columbia during 2008–2012.

The economic impact studies conducted in 2002 and 2003 estimated:
• Approximately  1.1  million  additional  international  (U.S.  and  Overseas)  visitors 
• Approximately  $1.5  billion  incremental  spending  by  additional  international 
• Approximately $3.3 billion incremental GDP to 2015, including construction in-
• Approximately 25 percent of incremental visitors will be from overseas, 35 per-
cent  from  the  Pacific  Northwest  and  40  percent  from  other  parts  of  the  U.S. 
(Source: Tourism BC)
• Currently  about  40  percent  of  visitors  from  other  parts  of  the  U.S.  to  British 
Columbia travel through the Pacific Northwest, about 30 percent of British Co-
lumbia’s  overseas  visitors  also  visit  the  Pacific  Northwest.  Thus,  the  Pacific 
Northwest  can  anticipate  a  significant  number  of  additional  visitors  due  to  the 
2010 Games. (Source: Tourism BC)
• The  Pacific  Northwest  will  be  able  to  increase  this  through  tourism  marketing 
• Other  potential  benefits  to  the  Pacific  Northwest  will  include  investment  and 
• Benefits  will  extend  beyond  2012  as  British  Columbia  capitalizes  on  increased 
awareness  of  British  Columbia  as  a  destination  and  increased  capacity  due  to 
2010 infrastructure investments and new tourism businesses.

and an effective media relations strategy.

supplier (export) opportunities.

Thank you for the opportunity of speaking to your Subcommittee.

Senator SMITH. Well, Jane—if I may call you Jane? 
Ms. BURNES. Please do. 
Senator  SMITH.  I  attended  one  event  at  the  Salt  Lake  Games, 
and  it  was  something  never  to  be  forgotten.  It  was  a  spectacular 
success.  And  we  wish  that,  also,  for  Vancouver,  British  Columbia. 
And  I  know  your  facility  there,  and  they  are  superior  by  every 
measure. I think you have all the makings of hosting a great inter-
national event. 

Obviously, we’re looking for ways where we can—without compli-
cating  your  Games,  best  work  with  you  to  complement  those 
Games,  and  I  assume  you  would  welcome  advertising  from  the 
States of Oregon, Washington, and Idaho out there, as well as their 
Winter Wonderland attractions. 

Have  you  thought  about  advertising  for  tourism  on  this  side  of 

the border at your Games? 

Ms. BURNES. Well, we thought about it in terms of the rest of the 
country.  I  mean,  this  is—you  know,  you  tend  to—I’m  a  Vancouver 
native,  so  you  sort  of  tend  to  be  egocentric  about  getting  the 
Games,  and  then  you  take  a  breath  and  realize,  you  know,  every-
one’s  investing  in  this,  every  Canadian,  every  British  Columbian. 
And  the  opportunities  that  we  see  for  involving  the  rest  of  our 
huge  Province  are  the  same  way  that  we  see  in  involving  the 
States of Oregon, Washington, Alaska, and Idaho. It’s talking about 
the whole region. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

7

Yes, you’re coming to Vancouver; why don’t you come through Se-
attle.  You’re  coming  to  the  Vancouver  Games.  It’s  busy;  why  don’t 
you  go  skiing  in  some  other  resort,  be  it  in  British  Columbia  or 
somewhere in the States. 

I  think  that  working  together  as  we  are  through  PNWER  and 
working  together  at  a  working  level  in  the  economic  development 
organizations  is  really  going  to  be  the  key  for  both  of  us,  because, 
as I said, so many of the visitors are coming from south of the bor-
der,  and  they’re  bringing  that  experience  and  expectation  with 
them. 

Senator  SMITH.  You  know,  given  the  day  and  age  we  live  in  of 
international terrorism, I’m sure the thought is being given to that. 
I  mean,  going  from  Oregon  or  Washington  to  Canada,  we’re  going 
into  another  nation,  and  obviously  there  are  visa  issues.  It’s  not 
like  going  from  Idaho  to  Utah.  You’ve  got  to  clear  customs,  and  I 
suppose  there  will  be,  as  with  all  of  these  international  events, 
heightened security. 

Have  you  thought  about  how  you’re  going  to  reconcile  the  con-
venience  with  security  and  making  sure  your  country  is  safe,  and 
ours  as  well?  Is  there  a  way  to  have  efficiency  and  security  at  the 
same time? 

Ms.  BURNES.  Well,  in  order  to  win  the  bid,  we  had  to  dem-
onstrate to the IOC that we had a good security plan in place, and 
our security in Vancouver are working very closely with British Co-
lumbia  and  Federal,  and  it’s  all  led  by  the  RCMP.  And  it  is  work-
ing  through  our  customs  and  visa,  and  all  of  that  stuff  is  being 
done through the Federal Government. 

But  I  have  every  confidence  that  there  are  any  number  of  com-
mittees meeting and also taking advantage of the Athens and Salt 
Lake experience. 

We’re  in  a  different  country,  but  we’re  welcoming  the  world,  so 
we  are  welcoming  all  of  the  challenges  that  come  with  that,  and 
I’m pretty confident that it’s being looked after by the RCMP. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  in  asking  the  question,  I  know  every  pre-
caution  will  be  taken  to  provide  security,  to  protect  your  sov-
ereignty,  and  also  to  protect  your  people  and  ours  who  come  to 
visit. 

And I have—I recall at the Salt Lake Olympics, which were held 
right  after  9/11,  the  security  was  incredible,  but  the  efficiency 
wasn’t  compromised.  And  people  were  able  to  move  quickly  and 
without any inconvenience, that I could detect. 

And I’m sure that’s a model that you’ll benefit from, as will visi-
tors  from  Oregon  benefit  from,  as  you  implement  something  I’m 
sure quite similar. 

Ms. BURNES. There were Canadians that worked as volunteers in 

security in Salt Lake and absolutely learned some good lessons. 

Senator SMITH. Well, very good. Thank you so much. 
We’ll next go to Todd Davidson, who is the Executive Director of 
the Oregon Tourism Commission. And I know that Todd is already 
working on this issue, and I’ve shared with Todd my experience on 
a couple of radio programs in Oregon yesterday about this hearing 
today,  and  they  were  incredulous  as  to  how  this  could  have  any-
thing to do with Oregon. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

8

And  I  think  that  we’re  going  to  find  out  that  it  does,  and  the 
sooner  we  recognize  that  it  does,  the  better  prepared  we  will  be  to 
complement,  supplement,  and  help  to  facilitate  a  successful  game 
in Vancouver, to the profit of our own state as well. 

So, Todd, the mike is yours. 

STATEMENT OF TODD DAVIDSON, DIRECTOR, OREGON 

TOURISM COMMISSION 

Mr. DAVIDSON. Thank you, Senator, and good morning. 
For the record, my name is Todd Davidson, and I have the privi-
lege and pleasure of serving as the Director of the Oregon Tourism 
Commission,  and  I’m  before  you  today  at  both  your  invitation,  as 
well as on behalf of Oregon Governor Ted Kulongoski. 

As you mentioned in your opening remarks, Senator, this is truly 
an amazing time to be in Oregon and to be part of the tourism and 
hospitality industry. 

In  addition  to  some  of  the  facts  that  you  mentioned  and  as  evi-
dence  of  the  increasing  importance  of  tourism  and  hospitality  in 
Oregon, Oregon Business magazine ran a series of surveys back in 
December 2004, and the questions that they asked of Oregon busi-
ness  leaders,  Oregon  residents,  and  the  Oregon  Employment  De-
partment  was  who  would  be  the  major  employer  in  Oregon  within 
10  years.  Fifty-one  percent  of  Oregon’s  business  leaders  picked 
tourism  and  hospitality  as  the  major  employer  in  the  state  within 
10 years. That was the number two ranking, second only to health 
care. 

When  they  asked  Oregonians,  75  percent  of  Oregonians  said 
tourism  and  hospitality  would  be  a  major  employer  in  the  state 
within 10 years. That was number one over all other industry sec-
tors. 

And the Oregon Employment Department also said that the tour-
ism  and  hospitality  industry  would  be  a  major  employer  in  the 
state. 

So  it’s  significant  that  we’re  here  today  talking  about  the  2010 
Olympics,  because  as  you  very  aptly  pointed  out,  and  as  Ms. 
Burnes  mentioned,  their  success  can  also  mean  our  success,  that 
the more successful they are in Vancouver with the hosting of this 
Olympics,  the  more  opportunities  there  are  for  us  here  in  the  Pa-
cific  Northwest  and  the  State  of  Oregon  to  really  draft  off  of  that 
success. 

Today  we’ve  got  over  88,000  Oregonians  who  owe  their  jobs  to 
visitors  who  are  traveling  the  state,  spending  dollars,  euros,  the 
yen,  and  other  currencies  in  our  state.  So  we  really  see  our  objec-
tive as sustaining this momentum. 

So the question before the Committee today is, is there an oppor-

tunity here with the 2010 Olympics, and my answer is yes. 

So what we have done at this point at the Oregon Tourism Com-
mission  is  tendered  into  preliminary  conversations  with  both  the 
Washington  and  Idaho  tourism  offices  to  look  at  some  potential 
joint  promotional  opportunity  that  we  could  undertake  in  conjunc-
tion with the 2010 Olympics. 

We do believe that there’s potential, and we think that there are 
some  opportunities—again,  on  a  preliminary  basis,  I  just  would 
like to articulate for you and for the record here this morning, one, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

9

we  think  there’s  an  opportunity  to  position  the  Pacific  Northwest 
here  in  the  United  States  as  a  training  site  for  the  Olympic  ath-
letes  so  that  they  have  an  opportunity  to  acclimate  to  the  Pacific 
Northwest. 

And  oftentimes  with  the  celebrity  status  that  comes  with  those 
athletes,  you  can  also  then  begin  to  get  other  consumer  interests 
because this is where our team trained. So we think there’s an op-
portunity there to leverage the Pacific Northwest as a training site 
for Olympic athletes. 

We think there’s an opportunity to reach out to the thousands of 
noncredentialed  media.  Obviously,  there  will  be  thousands  of 
credentialed  media  there  to  cover  the  sporting  events  themselves, 
but  there  will  be  literally  hundreds,  if  not  thousands,  of,  quote, 
noncredential  media  that  will  be  in  Vancouver  to  write  about  the 
lifestyle of the Pacific Northwest. 

So we think there’s an opportunity there as well to help generate 
not  only  the  impact  during  2010  but  beyond  as  these  kinds  of  sto-
ries are written. 

We think there’s an opportunity to explore opportunities to build 
travel  packages  with  international  tour  operators,  to  utilize  the 
international  air  service  that  you  mentioned  in  your  opening  com-
ments,  PDX’s  air  service  out  of  town  here,  German  Airlines  out  of 
Frankfurt, Northwest Airlines out of Tokyo, and Mexicana Airlines 
out  of  Guadalajara  and  Mexico  City  to  bring  contestants  and 
attendees  alike  to  the  Northwest  and  encourage  them  to  spend 
some  of  their  discretionary  time  here,  either  before  or  after  the 
competitions. 

And then we think there’s an opportunity to actually look at the 
Games themselves and see what the three states here in the Pacific 
Northwest  might  want  to  do  together  to  influence  consumers  that 
are there at the Games to also visit the Pacific Northwest, whether 
this  is  distribution  of  collateral  material,  presence  of  a  kiosk,  and 
the  kinds  of  advertising  opportunities  that  I’m  confident  are  being 
developed in Vancouver that we need to explore at the Games clos-
er. 

As  I  mentioned,  all  of  these  discussions  are  in  a  preliminary 
phase,  and  we’ll  be  exploring  these  and  other  opportunities  that 
will  help  us  capitalize  on  the  Olympics’  proximity  to  Oregon  and 
the Pacific Northwest. 

There  are  a  couple  of  challenges  that  are  on  the  horizon  that 
make  it  somewhat  difficult  to  adequately  forecast  the  impact  the 
Olympics  could  have  on  Oregon,  many  of  which  you  mentioned  in 
your  questions  to  Ms.  Burnes  about  security  concerns  and  facili-
tating that international travel. 

So  just  for  the  sake  of  expediency,  the  two  I  would  like  to  men-
tion  this  morning,  just  again  for  your  information  as  we  move  for-
ward, one is the visa processing requirements. In August 2003, we 
implemented a requirement that all of these applicants need to ap-
pear  in  person  at  a  U.S.  Embassy  or  a  Consulate  in  order  to  have 
an in-person interview to receive a visa. 

Obviously,  this  is  for  countries  that  are  not  part  of  our  very  ag-
gressive  Visa  Waiver  Program  in  which  27  countries  are  currently 
involved in. But for non-Visa Waiver countries, they need to do an 
in-person interview before they can receive their visa. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

10

What  this  sometimes  means  in  large  countries  where  we  may 
have a limited State Department presence is that they almost have 
to  take  a  vacation  in-country  before  they  can  take  a  vacation  out 
of  the  country,  because  everybody  in  the  family  who  is  going  to  be 
taking the trip needs to go in for that interview in order to receive 
their visa in advance. 

So concerns about that—the need to take that additional trip and 
being  adequately  staffed,  of  course,  to  handle  the  influx  that  could 
come as a result of the proximity of the Olympics is something that 
I hope we’re able to keep in mind as we move forward. 

The  second  challenge  I  wanted  to  bring  to  your  attention  is  one 
requiring biometric passports. These are the electronic scans of the 
eyes, face, or fingers that were being discussed. 

And  I  need  to  say,  obviously,  for  the  record,  biometric  passports 
are an important element in securing our borders. Definitive identi-
fication  of  international  visitors  through  biometrics  will  allow  U.S. 
Inspectors  to  admit  legitimate  travelers  with  greater  confidence. 
This will increase security, as well as lessen the wait time, both of 
which  are  critically  important  to  us  in  the  tourism  and  hospitality 
industry. 

There  was  a  deadline,  as  you  may  be  well  aware  of,  October  26, 
2005,  for  our  Visa  Waiver  Program  participating  countries  to  have 
biometric  passports  in  place.  However,  only  a  handful  of  those 
countries might have been able to meet that deadline, so Congress 
has  agreed  to  extend  that  deadline,  and  we  applaud  that  decision. 
They  also  allowed  an  additional  biometric  identifier  that  would 
be  using  a  digital  photograph.  Both  of  these  decisions  are  helping 
create  greater  certainty  in  our  international  marketplace  and 
amongst  the  international  travel  trade,  and  so,  Senator,  I  applaud 
your work and Congress’ work on extending the biometric passport 
deadline  as  we  move  forward,  because  it  does  mean  a  great  deal 
to  the  13  million  Visa  Waiver  Program  visitors  who  travel  to  the 
United States every year. 

In  closing,  Senator,  I  guess  I  would  like  to  say  that  America  is 
still  an  incredibly  special  place,  and  it  is  the  special  place  it  has 
always been. We remain a premier destination with more things to 
see and do than probably any other single country. 

And  I  would  like  to  believe  that  when  visitors  have  visited  here 
and they travel home that they’ve been enriched and enraptured by 
our  culture  and  who  we  are,  and  the  2010  Olympics  will  afford  us 
another such opportunity. 

I  remain  eager  to  explore  the  opportunities  that  the  2010  Olym-
pics  will  afford  us  and  our  partners  here  in  the  Pacific  Northwest. 
And  I’m  grateful  for  your  leadership,  Senator  Smith,  in  bringing 

us here together today. Thank you very much. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Davidson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TODD DAVIDSON, DIRECTOR, OREGON TOURISM 

COMMISSION 

Good morning, Senator Smith and Members of the Committee. For the record, my 
name  is  Todd  Davidson  and  I  have  the  privilege  and  pleasure  of  serving  as  the  Di-
rector of the Oregon Tourism Commission. I am before you today at both the invita-
tion of the Committee and on behalf of Oregon Governor Ted Kulongoski. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

11

The statutory mission of the Oregon Tourism Commission is to encourage the eco-
nomic  growth  and  to  enhance  the  quality  of  life  in  Oregon  through  a  strengthened 
economic impact of tourism throughout the state. 

To  accomplish  this  mission,  the  Tourism  Commission  and  staff  identify  and  pro-
mote an image of Oregon that is unique, exciting, natural and friendly. Throughout 
its  activities,  the  Oregon  Tourism  Commission  follows  these  marketing  goals  and 
performance measures as set forth by the Oregon Legislature:

1. Maximize the return on investment in tourism.
2.  Encourage  longer  stays  by  visitors  to  Oregon  and  reduce  seasonal  fluctua-
tions in travel related industries.
3. To encourage visitors, including Oregonians, to be destination-oriented in this 
state.
4. To encourage international visitors to come to Oregon.

And,  with  these  objectives  firmly  in  hand,  there  has  never  been  a  more  amazing 

time to be in Oregon and to be part of the tourism and hospitality industry. 

Visitor expenditures directly generate over 88,000 jobs for Oregonians. 
But the broader, collective tourism and hospitality industry supports over 150,000 
jobs!  And  when  we  take  into  account  the  secondary  jobs  this  industry  supports,  we 
surpass 200,000 jobs! 

This  means  that  one  out  of  every  nine  Oregonians  is  employed,  either  directly  or 

indirectly, by the tourism and hospitality industry. 

As  evidence  of  the  increasing  importance  of  the  tourism  and  hospitality  industry 
in  Oregon,  Oregon  Business  magazine  ran  a  series  of  surveys  in  their  December 
2004  issue.  The  question  they  asked  was  one  of  major  employers  in  Oregon  in  the 
future.

Subscribers  to  the  magazine,  business  leaders  in  Oregon  ranked  tourism/recre-
ation  #2  with  51  percent  respondents  agreeing  tourism/hospitality  would  be  a 
major employer in Oregon within 10 years.
Then, Oregon Business did a random sampling of Oregonians. Seventy-five per-
cent  of  respondents  ranked  tourism  and  recreation  (#1)  as  the  major  employer 
within ten years.
And  then  the  magazine  asked  the  Oregon  Employment  Department  who  the 
largest employers would be in 2012 and they named eating and drinking estab-
lishments and accommodations #2.

Through  every  program,  great  idea  and  minor  tweak  the  Oregon  Tourism  Com-
mission implements—we strive to never take our eyes off the prize—and, as you can 
see, it’s about jobs. Good jobs for Oregonians.

Jobs where they can learn work maturity skills and jobs where they can estab-
lish their careers.
Jobs where they can become part of a major multi-national corporation and jobs 
where  they  are  the  proprietor—showing  up  every  morning  to  unlock  the  door.
Today,  over  88,000  Oregonians  owe  their  jobs  to  visitors  traveling  and  spending 

dollars, euros, yen and other currencies in our state. 

And we have watched these expenditures grow—not only during the last decade—
but  especially  during  this  last  year  when  we  experienced  6  percent  growth—our 
fastest  rate  of  growth  in  the  past  5  years.  And  I  am  thrilled  to  stand  before  you 
today  and  celebrate  the  fact  that  visitor  spending  reached  nearly  $7  billion  last 
year! 

So, our objective must be to sustain this momentum. 
To accomplish this, the Oregon Tourism Commission has three primary audiences 

that we serve:

1.  Potential  and  actual  visitors  who  are  served  through  our  advertising  pro-
grams, publications, welcome centers and website.
2. Travel agents, tour operators and travel media who are served with publica-
tions, trade shows, sales calls, hosted itineraries, slide library and website.
3.  Industry  partners—private  businesses,  local  chambers  of  commerce,  visitor 
bureaus  and  governmental  organizations  that  benefit  from  research,  education 
and training, workforce development and cooperative partnerships.

To  reach  these  audiences,  the  Oregon  Tourism  Commission  implements  several 
key programs designed to better position Oregon in the mind of the traveling public. 

The results of these programs and partnerships are impressive.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

12

• The  Commission’s  recent  advertising  campaigns  generated  220,000  new  trips—
185,300 new overnight and 35,000 new day trips between March 2000 and Feb-
ruary  2002.  It  is  important  to  note  that  84  percent  of  the  trips  generated  by 
the  Commission’s  advertising  campaigns  included  at  least  one  overnight  and 
only 16 percent were day trips.

• These visitors spent more than $40 million in Oregon.
• The  cost  of  generating  one  trip  to  Oregon  is  only  $1.69,  and  every  marketing 
dollar  invested  by  the  Tourism  Commission  results  in  $114  in  new  visitor 
spending.
• Every dollar the Commission spends on advertising generates $3.40 in state tax 

revenue and $1.60 in local tax revenue (a return of 5:1).

The  Tourism  Commission  has  strived  to  run  effective  programs  maximizing  the 
return on investment to Oregon. This research indicates that we have been success-
ful. 

So, the question before the Committee today is, ‘‘Is there an opportunity to garner 
economic  return  from  the  2010  Olympics  being  held  in  Vancouver,  British  Colum-
bia? And my answer would be ‘‘yes.’’

The Oregon Tourism Commission has entered into preliminary conversations with 
both  the  Washington  and  Idaho  tourism  offices  to  discuss  potential  joint  marketing 
programs in conjunction with the 2010 Olympics. 

We feel there is potential opportunity in several key areas, most notably,

1.  Positioning  the  Pacific  Northwest  as  a  training  site  for  the  Olympic  athletes 
seeking to acclimate to the Pacific Northwest.
2.  Reaching  out  to  the  thousands  of  non-credentialed  media  that  attend  the 
Olympics to generate lifestyle stories.
3. Exploring opportunities to build travel packages with international tour oper-
ators  to  utilize  our  international  air  service—including  PDX’s  air  service  on 
Lufthansa  German  Airlines  from  Frankfurt,  Germany;  Northwest  Air  Lines 
from  Tokyo,  Japan;  and  Mexicana  Airlines  from  Guadalajara  and  Mexico  City, 
Mexico—to  bring  contestants  and  attendees  alike  through  the  Northwest  and 
encouraging  them  to  spend  some  discretionary  time  here  either  before  or  after 
the competitions.
4.  Having  some  type  of  presence  at  the  Olympic  venues  to  reach  the  inter-
national  consumers  and  build  awareness  of  travel  opportunities  in  the  Pacific 
Northwest.

As  I  mentioned,  these  discussions  are  in  a  preliminary  phase  and  we  will  be  ex-
ploring these and other opportunities to capitalize on the Olympics proximity to Or-
egon and the Pacific Northwest. 

There  are  some  challenges  on  the  horizon  though,  that  make  it  difficult  to  ade-
quately  forecast  the  impact  the  Olympics  could  have  on  Oregon,  the  Pacific  North-
west and the United States. 

The first of these challenges is found in our visa processing requirements. The Au-
gust  2003  requirement  that  nearly  all  visa  applicants  appear  in  person  at  a  U.S. 
embassy or consulate has increased the workload at many visa-issuing posts. While 
additional  staff  have  been  deployed  since  then,  in  some  locations  major  delays  con-
tinue  to  occur  due  to  shortages  of  personnel  or  office  space.  I  am  concerned  that 
delays in visa issuance are acting to deter prospective international visitors. 

The  second  challenge  is  found  in  our  requirement  for  biometric  passports  (elec-
tronic  scans  of  the  eye,  face,  or  finger).  Biometric  passports  are  an  important  ele-
ment  in  securing  our  borders.  Definitive  identification  of  international  visitors 
through  biometrics  will  allow  U.S.  inspections  to  admit  legitimate  travelers  with 
greater confidence. This will increase security as well as lessen wait times at inspec-
tion. 

However, there was a looming deadline of October 26, 2005, for the VWP partici-
pating  countries  to  begin  issuing  these  new,  high-tech  passports  containing  biomet-
ric  identifiers.  It  was  believed  that,  at  best,  only  a  handful  of  the  27  Visa  Waiver 
countries would be able to meet the October 26, 2005 deadline. It was also question-
able if the U.S. State Department would be ready to start issuing biometrically en-
abled U.S. passports by that time. This deadline has now been extended by one ad-
ditional year and an additional biometric identifier—a digital photograph—has been 
added to the choices. 

The bottom-line is that uncertainty about these deadlines in the marketplace only 
discourages  travel  to  the  U.S.  and  could  have  a  crippling  effect  on  future  travel 
bookings  for  this  coming  fall  and  beyond.  Congress’  recent  action  to  statutorily  ex-
tend this deadline was critically important to our tourism trading partners and the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

13

more than 13 million Visa Waiver Program visitors that can continue to travel unin-
terrupted to the United States.

(The  27  Visa  Waiver  Program  countries  include:  Andorra,  Australia,  Austria, 
Belgium,  Brunei,  Denmark,  Finland,  France,  Germany,  Iceland,  Ireland,  Italy, 
Japan,  Liechtenstein,  Luxembourg,  Monaco,  Netherlands,  New  Zealand,  Nor-
way,  Portugal,  San  Marino,  Singapore,  Slovenia,  Spain,  Sweden,  Switzerland, 
and the United Kingdom.)

America is still the special place it has always been and each of these challenges 
can  be  overcome.  We  remain  a  premier  destination  with  more  things  to  do  and  see 
than any other single country. 

I  like  to  think  that  when  visitors  leave,  they  have  been  enriched  and  enraptured 
by our culture and who we are. And the 2010 Olympics will afford us another such 
opportunity.  I  remain  eager  to  continue  to  explore  the  opportunities  that  the  2010 
Olympics  afford  us  with  our  partners  in  the  Pacific  Northwest  and  am  grateful  for 
your leadership, Senator Smith, in convening this hearing this morning. 

Thank you.

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Todd. 
Jane,  do  you  have  a  comment  to  his  in  terms  of  the  biometric 

passports? Does that fit in with your thinking? 

Ms.  BURNES.  I’d  have  to—I  don’t  represent  the  Federal  Govern-
ment, and that’s their responsibility. So I wouldn’t be able to make 
a comment. 

Senator SMITH. OK. Very good. Well, thank you. 
Dave Riley is the Vice President and General Manager of the Mt. 

Hood Meadows Ski Resort. It’s a very nice place. 

Obviously,  Dave,  you  represent  a  place  that  with  the  right  kind 
of  advertising  would  no  doubt  attract  a  lot  of  people  who  not  only 
want  to  watch  skiing  at  an  Olympic  level  but  perhaps  afterwards 
try and reenact it on your slopes. 
So with that, the mike is yours. 
STATEMENT OF DAVE RILEY, VICE PRESIDENT/GENERAL 

MANAGER, MT. HOOD MEADOWS SKI RESORT 

Mr.  RILEY.  Thank  you,  Senator.  A  little  background.  I’ve  spent 
my  entire  career,  20  years,  in  this  business  and  have  worked  at 
other  large  destination  resorts  in  Wyoming  and  Colorado  and  New 
Mexico  before  coming  here  for  the  past  12  years,  so  I  have  a  little 
experience  in  the  role  of  facilities  and  attracting  national  tourism. 
The  2010  Winter  Olympic  Games  will  attract  approximately 
6,000  athletes  and  officials,  10,000  members  of  the  media,  and 
14,000 volunteers. 

Salt  Lake  City  reported  the  2002  Olympics  attracted  220,000 
total visitors during the 17 days of the event. Ninety thousand visi-
tors  were  domestic,  and  a  good  portion  of  those  visitors  came  from 
the Western United States. 

But  the  legacy  that  Vancouver  and  Whistler  will  have  created 
through  their  hosting  of  the  2010  Olympics  will  have  an  impact 
long into the future. 

The  key  ‘‘win’’  for  Salt  Lake  City’s  hotel  industry  was  the  mas-
sive  international  exposure.  Whistler  will  benefit  from  this  expo-
sure for decades to come. 

The  Sea  to  Ski  Highway  that  was  mentioned  earlier  is  a  $600 
million  construction  project,  and  it  will  reduce  the  drive  time  from 
Vancouver to Whistler by 30 minutes. 

The  construction  of  world  class  winter  sports  training  facilities 
and  competition  venues  in  Vancouver  and  at  Whistler  will  attract 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

14

enthusiasts  and  spectators  for  training  and  competition  long  into 
the future. 

However, studies indicate that the economic impact with the big-
gest payoffs will require an exemplary tourism marketing program 
both before and after the Games for the whole of British Columbia, 
in  addition  to  Games  marketing  planned  for  by  the  Bid  Corpora-
tion. 

So what can Oregon do to take advantage of this Olympic oppor-
tunity? There are several things. First, capitalize on the skiers and 
snowboarders  around  the  world  who  are  avoiding  Whistler  during 
the Olympics, looking for other places to recreate. 

It’s interesting that in Salt Lake City the skier visits were actu-
ally  down  that  year  by  9  percent.  The  reason  they  did  it  was  the 
next  year  they  were  up  even  higher,  and  they  had  set  records  in 
Idaho——

Senator SMITH. They were down in Utah? 
Mr. RILEY. Yes, in Utah. 
Senator SMITH. But they were up in Idaho? 
Mr.  RILEY.  That’s  right,  because  the  biggest  ski  clubs  are  in 
places  like  Texas  and  Florida  and  the  Midwest  and  the  Eastern 
Seaboard.  Where  are  those  people  going  to  go?  They’re  going  to  go 
to Whistler the following year in great numbers. 

Senator SMITH. And that happened in Utah as well? 
Mr. RILEY. Exactly. 
Senator SMITH. Dramatically, I believe. 
Mr. RILEY. Yes. 
So,  obviously,  Travel  Oregon  should  place  TV  and  Internet  ads 

during the Olympic coverage to reach those tuned in. 

Senator  SMITH.  And  what  would  you  advertise  on,  like  ESPN, 

that sort of thing? 

Mr.  RILEY.  Yes,  there’s  a  number  of  their  websites.  There’s  tele-
vision  coverage  that’s  going  to  be  happening  here  domestically. 
Like when you were watching the Salt Lake City Games, those are 
expensive  ads,  but  there  are  opportunities  to  expose  Oregon  to 
great numbers of people who fit the profile. 

The  Nagano  Games  website  set  a  world  record  and  Olympic 
record, receiving 646 million hits during the 15 days of the Games, 
peaking at 103,000 hits per minute on their website. 

Travel Oregon should work closely with the ski areas to leverage 
international  media  that  will  travel  here  to  profile  and  feature 
their athletes. 

Basically  there  will  be  a  great  number  of  stories  done  on  these 
athletes  on  Mt.  Hood  who  are  visiting  here  to  train  leading  up  to 
the Games. 

Capitalize on the drive traffic through the I–5 and I–84 corridors 

of the spectators traveling to and from the Games. 

And  then  establish,  as  you’ve  mentioned  earlier,  Oregon-grown 

and manufactured products in Vancouver and Whistler. 

And  you  can  actually  use  the  Welcome  Centers  here  in  Oregon 
to  sell  Olympic  items.  A  lot  of  people  did  quite  well  selling  items 
in Salt Lake City. I don’t think you left without a shirt. 

Senator SMITH. I’ve got a shirt. I’ve got lots of little pins. 
Mr.  RILEY.  Right.  And  if  we  do  all  of  that,  we  may  see  some  in-
crease in tourism, particularly during the 17 days of the Olympics. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

15

It  is  interesting  to  note  that  the  weather  patterns  and  snowfall 
on Mt. Hood are no different from Whistler. We share the same Pa-
cific zone conditions. We actually have a higher base elevation, too. 
If Oregon really wants to increase the economic impact from win-
ter tourism, amenities and event venues that meet the expectation 
of the international visitor have to be constructed on Mt. Hood. 

Portland, Hood River, and Government Camp already have much 
of  the  infrastructure  needed  to  host  the  Olympics  or  other  large 
winter competitive events, like world class or world cup ski events. 
Mt.  Hood  can  provide  the  venues  for  the  alpine  and  nordic 
events,  but  consider  what  is  still  needed:  A  village  or  villages  con-
structed  on  Mt.  Hood  to  be  able  to  host  a  delegation  of  6,000  ath-
letes  and  officials.  That  may  sound  like  a  large  number,  but  right 
now  our  resort  hosts  over  10,000  people  a  day  on  average  on  a 
given weekend. Mt. Hood is the largest ski mountain in Oregon, ac-
tually hosting twice the number of skiers as Mt. Bachelor. But be-
cause  we’re  three  areas,  it  divides  up,  and  people  look  at  us  as  if 
we’re smaller. 

We  have  over  20  chairlifts  on  Mt.  Hood.  We  host  over  850,000 
visitors  each  year  on  Mt.  Hood,  so  it’s  twice  the  number  of  Mt. 
Bachelor. 

Winter sport competition venues constructed at Mt. Hood and in 
Portland,  which  will  serve  as  venues  during  the  large  events,  but 
also  be  used  to  train  athletes  on  Mt.  Hood  year-round  into  the  fu-
ture. Mt. Hood is the only ski area in North America that skis into 
August.  It’s  a  tremendous  opportunity  that’s  not  being  capitalized. 
Transportation  improvements  between  Portland  and  Mt.  Hood 
and  between  Government  Camp  and  the  major  ski  areas  need  to 
be improved. 

The reality is that Oregon has not been able to capitalize on win-
ter  tourism  at  the  level  of  California,  Idaho,  Utah,  Colorado,  or 
British  Columbia  because  of  Forest  Service  reluctance  to  approve 
the necessary amenities and facilities on Federal lands at the base 
of the existing winter sports areas. 

Even if Oregon does not pursue an Olympic bid in the future, we 
can  best  take  advantage  of  the  displaced  visitors  who  would  have 
otherwise  gone  to  Whistler,  and  into  the  future,  after  the  Olympic 
games, by developing the amenities on Mt. Hood between now and 
2010  that  are  necessary  to  influence  their  vacation  destination 
choices. 

We  can  use  the  exposure  of  the  Olympics  to—that  the  exposure 
will  bring  to  the  Northwest  to  expose  the  international  tourists  to 
these new facilities, but only if they’re constructed by 2010. 

I  leave  you  with  this:  Until  Forest  Service  policy  and  strategies 
change to allow for the construction and development of world class 
facilities  and  venues  needed  to  present  major  winner  events  and 
meet  the  expectations  of  the  winter  tourists,  we  will  never  cap-
italize on winter international tourism. Even though we have spec-
tacular mountains and ski slopes, we don’t have the amenities and 
facilities that other winter destinations enjoy. 

Oregon has a unique combination of a vibrant city in close prox-
imity  to  a  world  class  winter  recreation  area,  but  it  is  incomplete 
from  an  international  visitor’s  point  of  view  due  to  the  lack  of  pe-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

16

destrian  villages  at  the  base  of  the  ski  areas.  One  only  needs  to 
visit Whistler or Deer Valley to see what Oregon is missing. 

Thank  you,  and  I  would  like  to  answer  any  questions  that  you 

may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Riley follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVE RILEY, VICE PRESIDENT/GENERAL MANAGER, MT. 

HOOD MEADOWS SKI RESORT 

The  2010  Winter  Olympic  Games  will  attract  approximately  6,000  athletes  and 

officials, 10,000 members of the media, and 14,000 volunteers. 

Salt Lake City reported the 2002 Olympics attracted 220,000 total visitors during 
the  17  days  of  the  event.  Ninety  thousand  of  those  visitors  were  domestic—a  good 
portion of that from the Western United States. 

But  the  legacy  that  Vancouver  and  Whistler  will  have  created  through  their 

hosting of the 2010 Olympics will have an impact long into the future.

1.  The  key  ‘‘win’’  for  Salt  Lake  City’s  hotel  industry  was  the  massive  inter-
national exposure. Whistler will benefit from this exposure for decades to come.
2. Vancouver to Whistler—Sea to Sky Highway Improvements, the $600 million 
construction  project  will  reduce  the  drive  time  from  Vancouver  to  Whistler  by 
30 minutes.
3.  The  construction  of  world  class  winter  sports  training  facilities  and  competi-
tion  venues  in  Vancouver  and  at  Whistler  will  attract  enthusiasts  and  spec-
tators for training and competition long into the future.

However,  studies  indicate  that  the  economic  impact  with  the  biggest  payoffs  will 
require  an  exemplary  tourism  marketing  program  both  before  and  after  the  Games 
for  the  whole  of  British  Columbia  (in  addition  to  the  Games  marketing  planned  for 
by the Bid Corporation). 

So what can Oregon do to take advantage of this Olympic opportunity?

1.  Capitalize  on  skiers  and  snowboarders  around  the  world  avoiding  Whistler 
during the Olympics, looking for other places to recreate.
2. Travel Oregon should place TV and Internet ads during Olympic coverage to 
reach those ‘‘tuned in’’.

a. Television ads promoting Utah tourism aired in select West Coast markets 
reaching  6.1  million  people  during  closing  week  of  the  Games.  This  adver-
tising  resulted  in  nearly  50,000  visits  to  the  Utah.com  and  skiutah.com 
website  promotion  pages  and  roughly  3,000  calls  to  the  Ski  Utah  call  center.
b. The official Nagano Games website set a World and Olympic record, receiv-
ing 646 million hits during the 15 days of the Games, peaking at 103,429 hits 
per minute.

3.  Travel  Oregon  should  work  closely  with  the  ski  areas  to  leverage  inter-
national media that travel here to profile and feature their athletes.

a.  Profile  packages  should  be  produced  and  written  weeks  if  not  months  in 
advance.

4.  Capitalize  on  the  drive  traffic  through  the  I–5  and  I–84  corridors  of  spec-
tators traveling to and from the Games.

a. There could be 15,000 or more spectators from the intermountain west and 
California  traveling  through  Oregon  on  their  way  to  and  back  from  the 
games.  Border  crossing  will  have  to  be  expedited  for  automobiles  as  well  as 
air travel passengers.

5. Establish Oregon grown and manufactured products in Vancouver and Whis-
tler restaurants and retail shops.
6.  Oregon  Welcome  Centers  should  sell  official  Olympic  merchandise  (and  Or-
egon  businesses  can  offer  discounts  and  incentives  to  those  that  show  their 
Olympic merchandise to generate incremental repeat business).

And  if  we  do  all  that,  we  may  see  some  increase  in  tourism  particularly  during 

the 17 days of the Olympics. 

It is interesting to note that the weather patterns and snow quality on Mt. Hood 
are  no  different  from  Whistler,  British  Columbia.  We  share  the  same  pacific  zone 
conditions. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

17

If  Oregon  really  wants  to  increase  the  economic  impact  from  winter  tourism, 
amenities  and  event  venues  that  meet  the  expectation  of  the  international  visitor 
have to be constructed on Mt. Hood. 

Portland,  Hood  River,  and  Government  Camp  already  have  much  of  the  infra-
structure needed to host the Olympics or other large winter competitive events. Mt. 
Hood  can  provide  the  venues  for  the  alpine  and  nordic  events.  But  consider  what 
is still needed:

1.  A  village  or  villages  constructed  on  Mt.  Hood  to  be  able  to  host  a  delegation 
of 6,000 athletes and officials.
2.  Winter  sport  competition  venues  constructed  at  Mt.  Hood  and  in  Portland 
which  will  serve  as  venues  during  the  large  events,  but  also  be  used  to  train 
athletes on Mt. Hood year-round into the future.
3.  Transportation  improvements  between  Portland  and  Mt.  Hood  and  between 
Government Camp and the major ski areas.

The  reality  is  that  Oregon  has  not  been  able  to  capitalize  on  winter  tourism  at 
the level of California, Idaho, Utah, Colorado, or British Columbia because of Forest 
Service  reluctance  to  approve  the  necessary  amenities  and  facilities  on  Federal 
lands at the base of the existing winter sports areas. 

Even  if  Oregon  does  not  pursue  an  Olympic  bid  in  the  future,  we  can  best  take 
advantage  of  the  displaced  visitors  who  would  have  otherwise  gone  to  Whistler  by 
developing the amenities on Mt. Hood between now and 2010 that are necessary to 
influence their vacation destination choice. We can use the exposure that the Olym-
pics will bring to the northwest to expose the international tourist to the new facili-
ties, if constructed by 2010. 

I  leave  you  with  this—until  Forest  Service  policy  and  strategies  change  to  allow 
for  the  construction  and  development  of  world  class  facilities  and  venues  needed  to 
present major winter events and meet the expectations of the winter tourist, we will 
never  capitalize  on  winter  international  tourism.  Even  though  we  have  spectacular 
mountains and ski slopes, we don’t have the amenities and facilities that other win-
ter  destinations  enjoy.  Oregon  has  a  unique  combination  of  a  vibrant  city  in  close 
proximity to a world class winter recreation area, but it is incomplete from an inter-
national  visitor’s  point  of  view  due  to  the  lack  of  pedestrian  villages  at  the  base  of 
the  ski  areas.  One  only  needs  to  visit  Whistler  or  Deer  Valley  to  see  what  Oregon 
is missing. 

Thank you for the opportunity to provide you with this input.

Senator SMITH. Dave, are we missing it because of Forest Service 

regulations or resistance to improvements? 

Mr.  RILEY.  Yes.  And  the  reason  it’s  different  in  Oregon  and 
Washington  is  that,  unlike  in  Idaho,  Utah,  California,  the  base  of 
the  ski  areas  in  Oregon  and  Washington  are  Federally  owned. 
There is no private land at the base of the ski areas. 

And so we’re dependent upon the Forest Service’s policies and vi-
sion  for  those  areas,  and  historically,  or  up  until  now,  their  vision 
has  been  to  utilize  these  areas  as  day-use  areas  only,  whereas  the 
rest  of  the  country  have  created  the  facilities  that  attract  inter-
national  tourism,  because  they  have  villages  and  amenities  at  the 
base, exactly what they have at Whistler. 

And  you  don’t  see  that  in  Oregon  and  Washington,  and  it’s  be-

cause of the policy and strategy of the Forest Service. 

Senator SMITH. Is that policy and strategy modified between Ad-

ministrations at all? 

Mr.  RILEY.  It’s  been  very  consistent  between  Administrations.  It 
really hasn’t changed. Mt. Hood Meadows is 37 years old, and what 
is  amazing  is  we  have  11  chairlifts  with  22  acres  of  parking,  but 
we can’t get one acre for some overnight accommodations. 

I  couldn’t  even  get  approval  to  put  it  on  top  of  my  parking  lot. 
It’s just not—there is a lack of vision, and there is a disconnect be-
tween what is appropriate and what the opportunities are. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

18

Senator  SMITH.  I’m  sad  that  they  have  their  policies,  but  I’m 
wondering if you have that many visitors to Mt. Hood, and the Fed-
eral Forest Service was in a position to divide up 99-year leases of 
land up there for such a thing, that policy change could be effected. 
Do  you  think  that  that  would  draw  the  capital  necessary  to  turn 
it  into  a  world  class  kind  of  place  as  opposed  to  just  a  day  trip? 
Mr.  RILEY.  Absolutely.  We  can  raise  the  money.  We  don’t  need 

the Federal money. We just need the policy lifted——

Senator  SMITH.  What  kind  of  lease  or  ownership  opportunity  do 

you have to have to attract the money? 

Mr.  RILEY.  That’s  a  very  good  question.  There  are  two  ways  to 
do  it:  One  is  through  land  exchanges  where  the  land  becomes  pri-
vate.  The  other  is  through  long-term  leasing.  It  would  have  to  be 
what  you  described  in  order  to  be  able  to  attract  the  capital,  be-
cause an investor is not going to give into a hundred million dollar 
investment  that  doesn’t  have  the  certainty  that  they  will  have  the 
property for at least 99 years. 

But  in  Hawaii  or  in  Mexico,  that’s  exactly  how  it’s  done,  is  that 
the  government  owns  the  underlying  land,  and  they  get  99-year 
leases. 

Senator SMITH. Very good. You suggested some good ideas. 
Mr. RILEY. Thank you. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you very much, Dave. 
We’ll next hear from Mr. Drew Mahalic, who is the Chief Execu-

tive Officer of the Oregon Sports Authority. 

And,  Drew,  we  appreciate  very  much  your  time  and  your  work. 

STATEMENT OF DREW MAHALIC, CEO, OREGON SPORTS 

AUTHORITY 

testify. 

Mr. MAHALIC. Thank you, Senator Smith, for this opportunity to 

For  the  record,  I’m  the  CEO  of  the  Oregon  Sports  Authority. 
We’re  a  private  nonprofit  organization  with  leaders  representing 
the  public  and  private  side  of  the  state  of  Oregon.  Our  mission  is 
really to focus on economic development through sports tourism. 

In  the  10  years  of  serving  as  Oregon’s  sports  marketing  arm, 
we’ve  secured  two  Women’s  World  Cup  events,  the  U.S.  Figure 
Skating Championships, a World Sled Dog Championship, baseball 
championships.  We’ve  got  a  new  Action  Sports  Tour  coming  this 
month, a new Lance Armstrong Ride coming next month, and doz-
ens of other events that all have had more than a $100 million im-
pact on our state. 

In December 2002, we obviously knew about Vancouver’s interest 
in  the  Winter  Olympics,  and  we  provided  an  official  letter  of  sup-
port to them that was incorporated into their bid package. 

The  letter  simply  stated  that  we  will  do  whatever  we  could  to 
support their Olympic and Paralympic Winter Games and do what-
ever  it  took  to  realize  the  enormous  tourism  potential,  given  that 
we’re 300 miles south of Vancouver. 

We  obviously  recognize  that  there’s  tremendous  economic  poten-
tial  available  to  the  entire  Northwest  region  of  the  United  States 
from  these  Games.  Our  plan  is  to  really  start  with  a  State  of  Or-
egon plan and a Cascadia plan to do what we can to capture a part 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

19

of  the  multi-billion  dollar  projected  economic  impact  that  these 
Games will bring to Vancouver, British Columbia. 

One of the main targets obviously will be the athletes. There are 
about  2,550  or  more  athletes  that  will  be  competing  in  these 
Games, and they’ll want to acclimate themselves to the Pacific time 
zone  or  the  culture,  the  terrain,  the  weather,  and  we  feel  that  Or-
egon and Cascadia is really the perfect place for them to come. 

Particularly,  as  we’ve  just  heard  on  the  mountain  slopes,  there 
are  15  Olympic  sports.  Eleven  of  those  are  actually  snow  sports. 
Some  of  those  we  probably  can’t  handle,  like  the  bobsled  or  the 
luge. Ski jumping may be difficult. But there are seven strong snow 
sports  that  we  can  accommodate  that  would  be  perfect  training 
sites here in Oregon and in the Northwest for these events. 

We  also  have  a  number  of  ice  rinks.  There  are  four  ice  rink 
events in the Winter Olympics: hockey, figure skating, curling, and 
speed skating. We certainly will work with all the skating rinks in 
the  area  and  southwest  Washington,  which  also  can  become  great 
training  sites  for  the  teams  that  need  to  train  perhaps  outside  the 
media  chaos  that  might  be  going  on  in  Vancouver,  and  the  teams 
I think could be very successful in utilizing these resources. 

We’ll  additionally  develop  partnerships  with  all  the  health  club 
facilities.  Oregon,  as  you  know,  is  probably  the  best  place  for  aer-
obic  exercise.  It’s  where  all  the  world  class  runners  come  to  train. 
And  to  the  extent  that  that’s  part  of  training  for  these  athletes, 
we can certainly help facilitate their training here through running 
courses  and  facilitating  relationships  with  health  clubs,  which  we 
can make that happen. 

Just  within  the  last  year,  the  Oregon  Sports  Authority’s  former 
Chair, Randy Miller, and our consul here, Jim Baumgardner, trav-
eled to Seattle specifically to meet with the Vancouver Olympic Or-
ganization  to  forge  a  strong  business  relationship,  whereby  each 
agreed in principle to cooperate with each other for these Olympics. 
And just really fueled in part by this Senate hearing today, there 
are  plans  for  the  city  of  Portland  to  create  an  Oregon  delegation 
to  go  up  to  Vancouver,  meet  with  the  mayor  of  Vancouver,  to  fur-
ther  discuss  how  we  can  leverage  each  other’s  assets  in  a  collabo-
rative effort for these Winter Olympics. 

We’ll  additionally  build  as  many  partnerships  as  we  can.  I  be-
lieve  it  was  you,  Senator,  that  mentioned  that  we’ve  got  airlines 
that are flying directly in from Mexico, Europe, and Asia right into 
Portland,  and  we  can  certainly  encourage  tourism  as  they  land 
here. 

On the Board of the Oregon Sports Authority, we have solid rep-
resentation  from  Nike,  Columbia  Sportswear,  Adidas,  and  now  I 
guess  Adidas  and  Reebok,  from  the  merger.  And  it’s  not  insignifi-
cant  that  Oregon  has  this  as  its  sports  legacy—they  can  call  it 
home  to  the  three  largest  sports  apparel  companies  in  the  world. 
And to the extent that these companies have athletes and people 
interested in their sports, those are connections we need to exploit 
for people that come in here. They can certainly encourage athletes 
and  teams  that  have  been  sponsored  to  train  in  Oregon,  and  it’s 
another avenue for us to leverage as well. 

Senator  SMITH.  Are  you  aware  of  whether  Nike  and  Columbia, 
and  I  guess  Adidas,  are  they  in  any  way  preparing  for  this  2010? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

20

Mr. MAHALIC. Knowing the way they operate, they definitely are. 
But  I  would  suspect  that  they’re  not  thinking  yet  in  the  direction 
that  we  are,  obviously.  Their  agenda  is  not  tourism,  but  that  is 
something that we can certainly introduce to them. And given that 
they’re  all  interested  in  our  particular  agenda,  we  don’t  think  it 
will be a hard sell to get them to include that as part of what they 
want. 

You  know,  we’ve  heard  what  the  projected  economic  impact  is 
going  to  be  from  the  Vancouver  Olympics,  and  if  we  can  just  cap-
ture  a  small  percentage  of  that,  you  know,  I  think  you’re  talking 
something in the range of $50–$100 million in economic impact for 
the Northwest, which is huge. 

The other thing is that this may be—in terms of Olympic history, 
this may be our one shot for a long, long time at a Winter Olympics 
in  this  area.  You  know,  we  were  fortunate  to  have  it  fairly  close 
in  Salt  Lake  City  and  in  Vancouver,  but  the  bids  are  becoming  so 
competitive in the future, with other countries and other continents 
being more competitive, that we may not see another Winter Olym-
pics close to us for decades to come. 

And  so  it’s  really  our  time  to  seize  this—and  we  certainly  have 
enough  time  to  do  it—but  the  clock  is  ticking,  and  realistically, 
after  the  Olympics  in  Torino  in  2006,  this  one  will  jump  on  us  in 
a hurry. 

We’ll  do  what  we  can  to  realize  this  vision.  You  know,  obviously 
we’re  a  small  nonprofit.  Ideally,  we’d  like  to  look  to  partners,  per-
haps at this table and with the Federal Government, to see wheth-
er there’s a way to help us, perhaps fund a specific staff person or 
to get a staff person on loan that could look and help organize this 
Cascadia  effort  to  make  sure  that  we  really  do  capture  all  the  po-
tential that’s out there, and I think the potential is huge. 

You  know,  the  Olympic  motto  is  ‘‘Citius,  Altius,  Fortius,’’  which 
means  ‘‘Swifter,  Higher,  Stronger.’’  The  State  of  Oregon’s  motto  is 
‘‘She  flies  with  her  own  wings.’’  So  there’s  definitely  a  synergy 
within  the  ideals  of  the  Olympics  and  the  state  of  Oregon.  So  we 
hope to work with you in developing this synergy and capture that 
lucrative share of Olympic tourism. 

Thanks for hosting this Senate Committee meeting. We think it’s 
inspired  us,  and  we  look  forward  to  helping  in  every  way  that  we 
can. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Mahalic follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DREW MAHALIC, CEO, OREGON SPORTS AUTHORITY 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  at  this  hearing  on  the  economic  impact 
of the 2010 Vancouver, Canada, Winter Olympics on Oregon and the Pacific North-
west. 

I serve as the CEO of the Oregon Sports Authority, a private, nonprofit organiza-
tion  with  a  Board  of  Directors  that  represent  both  public  and  corporate  leaders  of 
the  state  of  Oregon.  Our  mission  is  to  promote  economic  development  throughout 
Oregon via the cultivation of sports events that encourage sports tourism. 

Our  organization  coordinates  efforts  to  bid  for,  promote,  and  manage  world-class 
sports events that make sense for the state of Oregon. During our ten years serving 
as  Oregon’s  sports  marketing  arm,  we’ve  secured  two  Women’s  World  Cup  soccer 
events,  the  U.S.  Figure  Skating  Championships,  a  World  Sled  Dog  Championship, 
World  Cup  Qualifiers,  Baseball  Championships,  a  new  Action  Sports  Tour,  a  new 
Lance  Armstrong  Ride,  and  dozens  of  other  events  which  have  had  more  than  a 
$100 million impact on the Oregon economy. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

21

In December 2002, the Oregon Sports Authority provided an official letter of sup-
port  to  the  Vancouver  2010  Bid  Corporation.  Our  letter  was  incorporated  into 
Vancouver’s Olympic bid package. The letter stated that the Oregon Sports Author-
ity would use our full resources to promote the Vancouver Olympic and Paralympic 
Winter Games and to help the Games realize the enormous tourism potential to Or-
egon  given  that  our  state  is  merely  300  miles  from  Vancouver,  British  Columbia. 
The Vancouver Olympics and Paralympics will host 15 different winter sports for 
more than 2,500 athletes from more than one hundred nations. There will be 9,600 
international  journalists  coming  to  the  Northwest  to  cover  the  Games,  6,000  cor-
porate  sponsors,  3,300  Olympic  officials,  650  judges,  and  250,000  visitors  attending 
these Olympics. Relying on reports from the Salt Lake City Olympics, the economic 
output of these Games is projected to be in the area of $5 billion. 

The  Oregon  Sports  Authority  recognizes  the  economic  potential  available  to  the 
entire  Northwest  region  of  the  United  States  from  the  Vancouver  Olympics  and 
Paralympics.  Our  plan  is  to  develop  both  a  state  of  Oregon  plan  and  to  work  with 
our border states to develop a Cascadia plan for the Northwest designed to capture 
a  part  of  the  multi-billion  dollar  economic  impact  these  Olympic  Games  will  bring 
to Vancouver, British Columbia. 

One  of  the  main  targets  of  our  Olympic  plan  are  the  2,550  Olympians  and 
Paralympians who will be highly interested in acclimating themselves to the Pacific 
time  zone  of  our  region,  our  altitude  and  weather,  and  the  Northwest  terrain  and 
culture.  For  the  snow  sports,  Oregon  and  Cascadia  have  a  brilliant  selection  of 
mountain  slopes  that  can  serve  as  magnificent  training  sites  for  at  least  seven  of 
the fifteen Olympic sports. 

Oregon and southwest Washington also offer a strong selection of ice rink venues 
to accommodate training needs for figure skaters, speed skaters, hockey teams, and 
curling  teams.  The  plan  of  the  Oregon  Sports  Authority  is  to  utilize  its  many  rela-
tionships  with  the  national  governing  bodies  of  specific  Olympic  and  Paralympic 
sports  so  that  they  are  aware  of  and  encouraged  to  have  their  teams  train  in  our 
ice rink facilities. 

We’ll  additionally  develop  partnerships  with  Oregon’s  multiple  health  club  facili-
ties  and  sports  medicine  clinics  that  will  present  Oregon  as  an  attractive  place  for 
additional athletic training. For those athletes interested in cardiovascular training 
for  endurance  in  their  sports,  we  will  ensure  that  our  magnificent  running  courses 
all over Oregon are well advertised to these elite athletes. 

Within  the  last  year,  the  Oregon  Sports  Authority’s  former  Chair,  Randolph  Mil-
ler,  traveled  to  Seattle  specifically  to  meet  with  the  Vancouver  Olympic  Organiza-
tion  to  forge  a  business  relationship  whereby  each  entity  agreed  in  principle  to  co-
operate  with  each  other  for  mutual  benefit.  And  within  the  last  month,  fueled  in 
part  by  this  Senate  hearing,  the  city  of  Portland  and  the  Oregon  Sports  Authority 
have  met  to  develop  a  plan  to  send  an  Oregon  delegation  to  meet  with  the  Mayor 
of  Vancouver,  B.C.  to  further  discuss  the  economic  collaborative  opportunities  of-
fered to each city by the Vancouver Olympics. 

The  Oregon  Sports  Authority  will  additionally  be  building  partnerships  among 
airlines,  Amtrak,  bus  coaches,  and  travel  agencies  to  ensure  that  Oregon  is  mar-
keted  as  a  convenient  tourism  destination  prior  to  and  after  the  Vancouver  Olym-
pics. There are direct flights into Portland from Europe and Asia that will make for 
an attractive and convenient stop in Oregon for the Olympic tourists. 

The  Oregon  Sports  Authority  will  also  utilize  the  power  of  its  Board  of  Directors 
who are corporate leaders for the world headquarters of Nike, Inc., the world head-
quarters  of  Columbia  Sportswear,  and  the  U.S.  headquarters  of  Adidas.  All  three 
of these giant apparel companies have a vested interest in the success of the Olym-
pics  and  Olympic  athletes.  Strategic  plans  will  be  explored  for  athletes,  coaches, 
judges,  and  tourists  who  have  an  affiliation  with  any  of  these  corporations  to  visit 
Oregon as part of their Olympic visit. 

The Oregon Sports Authority will be working collaboratively with Travel Oregon, 
the  Portland  Oregon  Visitors  Association  and  visitors  bureaus  from  other  regions 
and  southwest  Washington,  city  governments,  and  our  state  government  to  make 
sure  that  all  economic  opportunities  made  possible  by  the  Vancouver  Olympics  are 
duly  recognized  and  seized  for  the  Northwest’s  economic  advantage.  We’ll  addition-
ally work with our state to ensure that its Brand Oregon agenda includes marketing 
Oregon as a premier sports destination. 

Given  the  economic  potential  offered  by  the  Vancouver  Olympics,  there  is  every 
reason  to  believe  that  Oregon  and  the  Northwest  have  the  potential  to  capture  up 
to 1 percent of the $5 billion economic output from the Olympic Games which could 
equate to $50 million for the Northwest economy. The Oregon Sports Authority will 
strive to realize this vision with the limited financial and human resources we have 
at  our  disposal.  We  hope  to  forge  a  partnership  with  the  Federal  Government  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

22

all  the  above  partners  to  fund  a  dedicated  two-year  position  commencing  in  2006 
that would focus solely on developing the network and partnerships required to fully 
leverage  the  economic  potential  that  is  available  from  the  2010  Vancouver,  B.C. 
Olympic and Paralympic Games. 

The  Olympic  Motto,  ‘‘Citius,  Altius,  Fortius’’  which  means  ‘‘Swifter,  Higher, 
Stronger’’ is very much compatible with the state of Oregon’s motto, ‘‘She flies with 
her own wings.’’ There is definitely a synergy within the ideals of the Olympics and 
the state of Oregon. We hope to work with you in developing this synergy to capture 
a lucrative share of Olympic tourism. 

We  thank  and  applaud  your  Senate  Committee  for  recognizing  this  economic  op-
portunity  for  the  Northwest.  Thank  you  for  giving  us  the  chance  to  participate  in 
this hearing. I’ll be delighted to answer any questions that you may have.

Senator  SMITH.  Do  you  think,  though,  that  Oregon  really  is  not 
prepared  in  terms  of  infrastructure  or  the  size  of  our  economy  in 
this state to host an Olympics any time soon? 

Mr.  MAHALIC.  Well,  I  know  that  there  have  been  efforts  in  the 
past—in  fact,  there’s  one  person  in  the  audience  that  actually  led 
a major effort about 25 years ago for Oregon to do it. 

I  would  say,  Senator,  frankly,  that  we  probably  could  finesse 
hosting  the  Olympics  here,  but  in  terms  of  the  financial  demands 
by  the  Olympic  Committee,  I  just  don’t  see  the  Oregon  public  gov-
ernment stepping up financially——

Senator SMITH. To make those investments? 
Mr.  MAHALIC.—yes  to  make  those  kinds  of  guarantees  that  it’s 
calling for. You’re talking something far beyond anything our state 
has ever considered. 

Senator SMITH. Jane, can you refresh my recollection? Who were 

your competitor cities or nations for the 2010 Olympics? 

Ms.  BURNES.  Well,  when  we  got  down  to  the  last  ballot,  it  was 

Korea and Salzburg, Austria. 

Senator SMITH. Salzburg? 
Ms.  BURNES.  Yes,  and  Korea  was  only  a  couple  of  votes  behind 

Senator SMITH. Was Denver, Colorado, pushing for—or you’re not 

us. 

aware of it either? 

Ms. BURNES. I’m not aware of it. 
Mr. MAHALIC. I’m not aware of any. 
Mr. WILGUS. Reno is looking seriously at it. 
Senator SMITH. Reno? 
Mr. WILGUS. And so is Idaho. 
Senator  SMITH.  Well,  there’s  some  great  skiing  in  Idaho.  I  guess 
my only thought is, if Nevada can pull it off, Oregon can pull it off, 
in terms of size of economy and attractiveness and facilities and all 
of that. 

But, anyway, I’m not saying that it’s something——
Mr. MAHALIC. Oh, it certainly would be something that would be 
great  for  Oregon—that’s  the  absolute  ideal  in  terms  of  securing  a 
sports  event.  There  is  nothing  greater  than  securing  the  Olympics 
in this business. It’s the number one goal. 

Certainly Oregon has the majesty in terms of its topography and 
facilities,  but  we  would  have  to  have  a  metamorphosis  of  change 
in  the  government  to  be  able  to  step  up  financially  for  what  that 
requires. 

Senator SMITH. Yes. 
Mr.  RILEY.  Senator,  I  think  it’s  important  to  note,  though,  that 
there  are  many  other  steps  you  can  take  that  can  lead  to  that 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

23

which  could  be  beneficial  economically.  There  are  smaller  games. 
There  are  World  Cup  events.  There  are  a  number  of  national 
events that occur every year over and over again in Park City and 
Deer  Valley  and  Sun  Valley.  All  the  resorts  that  are  capitalizing 
on those events have this stream of income that is literally annual. 
The  Olympics  is  great.  It’s  a  one-time  shot.  It  provides  these  fa-

cilities an infrastructure that are incomparable. 

But absent going after the Olympics, there are still steps that we 
can  take  to  improve  our  economy  to  leverage  a  winter  recreation. 
Mr. MAHALIC. And just to add on, there is no reason why Oregon 
can’t become known in the future as one of the best Olympic train-
ing sites for Winter Olympics. As we’ve heard, we’ve got the moun-
tains.  There  are  11,  you  know,  snow  sports.  Certainly  there  is  no 
better place to train than in Oregon. 

So  we  may  not  be  actually  getting  the  Olympics,  but  to  become 

home for training sites would really set us apart as well. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  typically  the  preparation  for  2010  in  Brit-
ish  Columbia—because  skiing  in  Oregon  or  the  Pacific  Northwest 
is  a  different  sport  than  skiing  in  the  Rocky  Mountains.  It’s  a 
whole  set  of  different  conditions  of  snow—I  say  this  as  a  fairly  ac-
complished skier myself. I’ve skied in both places. 

Jane,  was  this  an  economic  undertaking  that  frankly  puts  a  lot 
of short-term strain on Vancouver, or does Canada as an entire na-
tion feel vested in it and contributing to it? 

Ms. BURNES. Well, the two major government partners, in terms 
of financial contribution, are the British Columbia Government and 
the  Federal  Government,  and  they  both  committed  during  the  Bid 
Phase  to  something  around  $250  million  each  toward  the  infra-
structure, not the operating. 

The  British  Columbia  Government  had  to  give  the  IOC  a  guar-
antee that they would cover any operating costs that weren’t picked 
up by the sponsors or by the organizing committees not having the 
ability to raise the funds. 

It  was  something  that  was  started  by  a  previous  government. 
But when this government got elected, they looked at it really hard 
from an economic standpoint, because they came in with a mandate 
to sharpen their pencils on the books, and they felt that they want-
ed to kind of get a better hold on the financial picture there. 

So  that  was  when  I  joined  this  effort,  and  the  first  thing  we  did 
was look at the economic impact and do some really formal studies 
to prove that an investment of that nature was going to benefit all 
of British Columbia and all of Canada. 

So  it’s  the  British  Columbia  government  that  is  playing  a  major 

role in backing this up. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  I  assume  the  whole  project  enjoys  wide, 

popular support, locally and throughout Canada? 

Ms. BURNES. It does now, but it had its rocky moments. And just 
to go back to the letters of support that we got from Pacific North-
west  states,  they  were  well-timed  because  we  actually  had  a  ref-
erendum  in  the  city  of  Vancouver,  and  we  had  people  in  Whistler 
that  were  concerned  that  sustainability  values  that  they  held  so 
closely were going to be overlooked, and they didn’t rush to get the 
Olympics. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

24

Just to speak to what some of my colleagues here have been say-
ing—and  you  sound  like  you  sort  have  got  the  Olympic  fever  a  bit 
yourself—about why can’t we host it here in Oregon. 

If  you  want  to  do  that,  the  best  thing  to  do  is  to  start  hosting—
like  become  a  training  center  and  to  start  hosting  those  World 
Cups.  Those  are  the  sorts  of  things  that  demonstrate  to  the  IOC 
that you’re serious and that you’ve got that ability, so those are the 
kinds of things that we did as a buildup. We held the World Figure 
Skating competition, for instance, a couple of years before we were 
awarded the bid. 

So  those  sorts  of  things  not  only  build  your  own  capacity  here, 
but  they  put  you  in  a  position  that  if  and  when  you  are  ready  to 
bid, that you’ve got that history that shows you’re serious. 

Senator SMITH. Well, it wouldn’t be a democracy if there weren’t 

some rocky moments. 

Anyway, we’re very, very privileged to have Carl Wilgus with us 
today.  He  is  with  the  Idaho  Tourism  Division,  I  believe  the  Direc-
tor? 

STATEMENT OF CARL WILGUS, STATE TOURISM DIRECTOR, 

IDAHO DIVISION OF TOURISM DEVELOPMENT 

Mr. WILGUS. Correct. 
Senator SMITH. And I think Idaho perhaps offers us the very best 
model  of  what  can  happen  to  Oregon  because  of  what  Idaho  en-
joyed from the Salt Lake Olympics. 

So, Carl, we thank you for your concern, your interests, and your 
willingness  to  come  here  and  share  with  us  the  Idaho  experience. 
Mr.  WILGUS.  Thank  you.  It’s  a  pleasure  for  me  to  be  here  today 
to  share  with  you  the  accomplishments  of  the  state  of  Idaho  as  a 
result of implementing its 2002 Strategic Plan. 

I feel compelled, though, on the outset to issue the following dis-
claimer:  ‘‘I  am  not  an  Olympic  expert.’’  I  have  been  fortunate 
enough,  though,  to  have  attended  several  Winter  Games  and  have 
been given some time and resources to implement a comprehensive 
strategy  to  take  advantage  of  the  2002  Games  in  Salt  Lake  City. 
By  all  account,  Idaho’s  efforts  were  successful.  This  was  made 
possible  by  three  very  important  actions:  First,  the  creation  of  a 
ten-point Strategic Plan that helped lead our direction. 

Second was the formation, via the Governor’s Executive Order, of 
a  statewide  2002  commission  to  oversee  all  levels  of  the  state  in-
volvement with the Salt Lake Games. 

And,  third,  a  development  of  a  revenue  stream  that  through  the 
passage  of  a  specialty  skier  license  plate  bill  in  1998  provided  a 
half  a  million  dollars  of  funds  to  support  the  implementation  of 
that plan. 

Now, before I talk about the specifics of the plan, I need to make 
one  more  acknowledgment.  While  a  reported  $100  million  in  eco-
nomic development was realized by the State of Idaho, it really was 
the social and cultural benefits that were gained by being involved 
in  the  Olympics  that  created  an  even  greater  return  on  invest-
ments for Idaho. 

We had many accomplishments, most of which or all of which are 

detailed in the report here that I have for you as well. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

25

But allow me to touch on a few of the most noteworthy, and some 
of  my  colleagues  referred  to  them  earlier.  Nearly  1  in  10  athletes 
of  the  3,500  athletes,  350  of  the  athletes  who  participated  in  the 
Salt Lake City Games competed or trained in the state of Idaho be-
fore or during the Games themselves. 

Early marketing efforts were started by identifying and soliciting 
national  Olympic  teams  to  consider  using  Idaho  as  a  training  site 
and acclimation location. A comprehensive directory was created by 
the state that showed people where they could train and what they 
could  do.  We  compiled  the  information,  published  it,  and  distrib-
uted it to national teams. 

The  Sun  Valley  area  in  particular  became  a  true  mecca  for  such 
training,  which  included  the  likes  of  the  Ukrainian  Biathlon  and 
Nordic Men’s and Women’s Team, the Norwegian Nordic Men’s and 
Women’s  Team,  the  Swedish  Biathlon  and  Nordic  Women’s  Team, 
the  Italian  Alpine  Men  and  Women’s  Team,  the  United  States  Al-
pine  and  Snowboard  Men  and  Women’s  Team,  the  Liechtenstein 
Nordic  Men’s  Team,  and  the  Slovakian  Men’s  Hockey  Team  all 
spent time before and during the games in the Sun Valley area. 

More  than  200,000  Idahoans  were  directly  exposed  to  the  Olym-
pic  movement  through  the  more  than  20  events  and  exhibitions 
staged  in  and  around  the  state.  This  allowed  many  families  and 
youth to experience the drama of international competition. 

Olympic  fever  hit  a  high  pitch  just  weeks  before  the  opening 
ceremonies  with  the  nine  community  stops  of  the  Olympic  Torch 
and the recorded record crowd of nearly 6,000 people who attended 
the  Bank  of  America  Center  in  Boise  and  witnessed  the  historic 
meeting of the USA/China Women’s Hockey Teams. 

Many  Idaho  businesses,  both  large  and  small,  took  advantage  of 
procurement opportunities, pumping tens of millions of dollars into 
Idaho’s economy. 

A  few  companies,  such  as  Washington  Group  International, 
which  is  responsible  for  most  of  the  freeway  construction  in  Salt 
Lake City, is housed in Boise, Idaho. 

Double A Company, which provided portable toilets to the Olym-

pics, is housed in Boise, Idaho. 

Fleetwood  Home  Manufacturing  out  of  Nampa,  Idaho,  provided 

trailers which were offices used at the Soldier Hollow. 

Idaho  Sewing  for  Sports,  a  Grangeville  company,  provided  pro-

tected padding on lift towers and finish areas. 

Jytte Mau, a specialty knit manufacturer in the Sun Valley area, 
25 percent of her gross revenues in 2002 came as a result of Olym-
pic contracts. 

And  even  Cascade  Raft  Company  provided  drivers  and  vans  to 
move  VIPs  and  officials  from  location  to  location.  That  doesn’t  ac-
count  for  even  the  hundreds  of  Idahoans  who  volunteered  and 
worked  in  different  events  and  different  areas  during  the  Games 
themselves. 

Additional  revenue  was  generated  by  the  Salt  Lake  bound  visi-
tors  who  stopped  on  the  way  to  or  from  the  Games  to  enjoy  Idaho 
and the thousands of Utah residents we were able to entice by our 
advertising campaigns to escape the crowds of the Games and come 
to Idaho. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

26

All  of  our  southern  Idaho  ski  areas  reported  increased  numbers 

of vehicles in their parking lots with Utah plates during 2002. 

Even  the  University  of  Utah  basketball  and  track  and  field 
teams  set  up  temporary  training  camps  in  Pocatello  during  the 
Games  because  they  were  displaced  from  their  university  setting. 
The establishment of a Western States Discovery Center, a three-
state—Idaho,  Nevada,  Utah—visitor  center  on  Main  Street  across 
from  the  Anheuser  Busch  Beer  Gardens  and  next  to  the  Canadian 
Roots  House,  proved  to  be  an  excellent  way  to  communicate  with 
Olympic attendees. 

Eleven  computers  provided  on-line  access  to  the  internet  so  that 
visitors  to  the  Center  could  e-mail  postcards  to  friends  and  rel-
atives at home and learn more about Idaho. 

More  than  250,000  brochures  were  distributed,  and  nearly  8,000 
electronic  postcards  were  sent  from  the  Center  during  the  Games. 
This Center not only distributed tourism information, but supplied 
substantial  amounts  of  material  regarding  business  expansion  and 
relocation opportunities to Idaho. 

As  I  mentioned  earlier,  our  success  was  not  a  matter  of  luck  or 
happenstance.  We  created  a  plan,  we  stuck  to  the  plan,  we  dedi-
cated  resources,  both  in  staff  and  dollars,  to  implement  the  plan. 
When  I  look  back  on  what  we  were  able  to  accomplish  and  have 
asked to provide suggestions or lessons learned, I would say garner 
the  support  of  the  host  state  or  province,  promote  the  social  and 
cultural  aspects  of  your  efforts,  have  some  kind  of  funding  source. 
Try  to  develop  some  kind  of  an  Olympic  pin.  As  we  discussed,  the 
currency of the Games is not a handshake and a business card but 
an Olympic pin. 

Senator SMITH. This is a potato? 
Mr.  WILGUS.  This  is  a  Spuddy  Buddy,  yes,  a  representative  of 

certain parts of our state. 

Senator SMITH. I understand. I ate a lot of them. 
Mr. WILGUS. Yes. 
To develop your plan early, find partners, and importantly, don’t 
just  plan  for  the  Games,  but  think  beyond  a  year  or  two  in  your 
planning process. 

I really believe Idaho’s success can be replicated in 2010, and we 
in  Idaho  plan  to  do  so.  However,  one  very  important  distinction 
does  exist:  Vancouver  is  in  the  Province  of  British  Columbia  and 
in  the  country  of  Canada.  This  is  first  and  foremost  a  Canadian 
Olympics,  and  that  will  create  a  different  set  of  circumstances  to 
be aware of. 

Thank  you  for  your  time,  and  I’d  be  happy  to  answer  any  ques-

Senator SMITH. Meaning the visa issue? 
Mr.  WILGUS.  Visa  and  border  crossing  itself.  In  the  original  bid 
that was put together by Vancouver, because it was the Vancouver 
Olympic Games, border issues were not a primary consideration. It 
was  airport  access  and  movement  of  people  around  Vancouver  and 
up to Whistler. 

And I’ve heard some things that I think give me the feeling that 
there  are  currently  some  gross  underestimations  in  terms  of  the 
amount of southbound traffic—from the south, it’s going to be going 
north across that border. 

tions. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

27

When you look at—Vancouver does not have low-cost air carriers 
like  Southwest  Airlines,  like  America  West,  or  like  JetBlue  pro-
viding  services.  So  much,  I  think,  of  the  domestic  travel  will  be 
coming  in  through  Seattle  and  Portland  and  then  transporting  up 
to Vancouver for cost consideration. 

We also know that when you have an Olympics, the airlines that 
serve that city inflate their prices. I mean, that’s their opportunity 
to make revenue. 

So smart, intelligent Olympic visitors will be looking at alternate 
airports, like Seattle and Portland, and then the problem is how do 
I get to Vancouver, to get there quickly and easily. 

And  I  think  that  we  need  to—we,  the  U.S.  Government—needs 
to  look  a  little  bit  more  closely  and  work  a  little  closer  in  partner-
ship with the Canadian government. That’s the whole issue of get-
ting  in,  which  will  obviously  be  a  Canadian  Customs  issue,  but 
they’re  also  going  to  come  back,  which  will  be  a  U.S.  Customs 
issue. 

Senator SMITH. So if Idaho’s experience with Utah license plates 
holds  true,  we  may  see  a  lot  of  the  British  Columbia  plates  in  Or-
egon? 

Mr.  WILGUS.  There’s  every  reason  to  believe  so.  I  would  submit 
to  you,  though,  Senator,  that  we  probably  won’t  be  taking  lots  of 
money  to  Vancouver  and  advertising  for  Vancouverites  to  leave 
Vancouver, but what we’ll probably be doing is going to Seattle and 
Portland,  because  you  produce  a  lot  of  skiers  in  Whistler  and 
Blackcomb, and we’ll be suggesting that Idaho may be an option for 
them. 

Senator SMITH. Yes, that’s the American and Canadian way. 
Mr. WILGUS. Well, we would like to be a great cooperator, but we 

would also like to be a brilliant marketer at the same time. 

Senator SMITH. That’s called free enterprise. 
Mr. WILGUS. Absolutely. 
Senator SMITH. We applaud it and we welcome it. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Wilgus follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CARL WILGUS, STATE TOURISM DIRECTOR, IDAHO DIVISION 

OF TOURISM DEVELOPMENT 

On  behalf  of  our  2002  Executive  Committee,  we’re  pleased  to  provide  you  with 
this report of our activities in connection with the staging of the 2002 Winter Olym-
pic Games. By almost all measures Idaho’s efforts were successful. A ten-point strat-
egy  was  developed  to  provide  a  blueprint  to  gain  economically,  socially,  and  cul-
turally from the 2002 Winter Games being held by our Southern neighbors. 

We  had  many  accomplishments,  which  are  detailed  in  the  report,  but  allow  me 

to touch on a few of the most noteworthy:

1. Nearly 1 in 10 of the athletes who competed in the Winter Games trained and/
or  competed  in  Idaho—early  marketing  efforts  were  started  to  identify  and  solicit 
national  Olympic  teams  to  Idaho.  A  comprehensive  directory  of  Training  Sites  was 
compiled, published, and distributed to national teams. The Directory identified crit-
ical contact information, highlighting facilities in Idaho that offered an ideal setting 
for training. The Sun Valley area became a true Mecca for such training, which in-
cluded the likes of:

Ukrainian Biathlon & Nordic (M&W) 
Norwegian Nordic (M&W) 
Swedish Biathlon & Nordic (W) 
Italian Alpine (M&W) 
United States Alpine & Snowboard (M&W) 
Liechtenstein Nordic 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

28

Slovakian Hockey (M)

2. Over 200,000 Idahoans were directly exposed to the Olympic movement through 
events  and  exhibitions—exposing  the  highest  ideals  of  the  Olympics  to  Idaho’s  citi-
zens  and  youth  through  the  staging  of  pre-  and  post-Olympic  events  proved  to  be 
one  of  the  most  fulfilling  things  we  could  have  done.  Over  20  events  were  staged 
in  Idaho  exposing  many  families  and  youth  to  the  drama  of  international  competi-
tion.  Olympic  fever  hit  a  high  point  in  Boise  just  weeks  before  the  opening  cere-
monies with the 9 community stops of the Olympic Torch and record crowd of nearly 
5,500 at the Bank of America Centre to witness the historic meeting of Team USA/
China women’s hockey teams.

3. Idaho received an economic impact of over $100 million in the two years leading 
up  to  the  Games  and  the  year  following—team  training,  the  special  exhibitions, 
along with visits by torch relay to Idaho, contributed millions of dollars to the Idaho 
economy.  Several  Idaho  businesses  large  and  small  took  advantage  of  procurement 
opportunities and pumped tens of millions of dollars into the Idaho economy. 

Such companies included:

Washington Groups—Highway Construction 
A–Company—Portable Toilets 
Fleetwood Homes—Trailers 
Idaho Sowing for Sports Inc.—Protective Padding 
Jytte Mau—Specialty Knit hats 
Cascade Raft Company—Drivers and Vans

Add  in  the  revenue  generated  by  Salt  Lake  City  bound  visitors  who  stopped  on 
the way to or from the Games to enjoy Idaho, and the thousands of Utah residents 
who were enticed by our advertising campaigns to escape the crowds of Games and 
come to Idaho. All our Southern Idaho ski resorts reported increased numbers of ve-
hicles  in  their  parking  lots  with  Utah  plates.  The  University  of  Utah’s  basketball 
and  track  and  field  teams  set  up  temporary  training  camps  in  Pocatello  during  the 
Games because they were displaced from the University.

4. Boise was permanently awarded the Olympic cauldron that carried the Olympic 
flame  across  the  country,  in  recognition  of  the  ‘‘enthusiasm,  spirit,  and  participa-
tion’’ it exhibited during the National Torch Relay—the torch relay began in Atlanta 
covered  13,500  miles  in  a  span  of  65  days.  Some  11,500  torchbearers  carried  the 
Olympic flame. When all was said and done of the more than 100 communities vis-
ited  Boise  was  selected  by  the  Salt  Lake  Olympic  Committee  as  the  outstanding 
torch relay community and permanently awarded the Olympic Torch cauldron. Just 
for your information, the cauldron is on display at World Sports Humanitarian Hall 
of Fame on the campus of Boise State University.

5. Idaho’s travel and tourism was significantly helped in the wake of 9/11, largely 
as  a  result  of  the  efforts  connected  with  the  Winter  Olympics—the  establishment 
of  the  Western  States  Discovery  Center,  a  three-state  (Idaho,  Utah,  and  Nevada) 
visitor  center  on  Main  Street,  proved  to  be  an  excellent  way  to  communicate  with 
more  than  65,000  Olympic  attendees.  Eleven  computers  provided  online  access  to 
the  Internet  so  visitors  to  the  Center  could  send  e-mail  postcards  to  their  friends 
and  family  at  home.  Over  7,500  postcards  were  sent  from  the  booth  during  the 
Games.  We  also  conducted  three  special  ‘‘Idaho  Days’’  featuring  Idaho  icons  like 
Spuddy Buddy, the Junior Jammers, and the Sho-ban Tribal Dancers.

We  are  pleased  that  so  many  Idaho  families  and  school  children  were  personally 
touched  by  the  spirit  of  the  Olympics.  The  efforts  of  the  many  businesses,  volun-
teers,  and  State  agencies  that  helped  our  State  benefit  from  this  significant  event 
is  greatly  appreciated  by  the  Committee  and  the  many  families  throughout  the 
State that were touched by the Olympic movement.

I think I have only one other question, and that is for you, Jane. 
Is there something that Oregon could do that we’re not doing to be 
helpful  to  you?  We  want  your  Games  to  succeed.  Are  there  ways 
that  we  can  coordinate  with  you  that  would  be  helpful  to  you  and 
collaterally beneficial to us? 

Ms. BURNES. I think that there’s been every demonstration from 
every level from people in Oregon. Oregon has always been cooper-
ative. 

And I think just continuing to keep in touch and share those les-
sons  that  we  learned  so  much  from  Idaho  that  Carl  put  together 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

29

when  we  were  putting  together  our  own  plans  for  economic  devel-
opmental  opportunities,  I  think—yes,  just  continuing  to  share  the 
information, because there’s—the plans that we have put into place 
and  the  opportunity  that  we  had  for  leverage  from  becoming  part 
of  this  Olympic  family  are  ones  that  you  can  take  along  and  start 
right now. 

Carl  and  I  were  talking  earlier  before  this  began  about  how  im-
portant  it  is  for  people  like  yourself  involved  in  the  industry  to  go 
to those games, if you get a chance. 

We’re  going  to  be  going  to  the  Torino  Games,  and  we’re  not  just 
going  to  learn  the  lessons  of  how  to  put  them  on,  but  I’m  respon-
sible for putting together a—actually, we’re building a log structure 
that  has  been  prebuilt  in  British  Columbia,  and  this  company 
made  its  name  on  an  international  field  by  winning  a  competition 
to put a lodge in Snow Basin Resort in Utah. 

So  they’re  now  being  able  to  win  the  next  competition  with  put-
ting  a  lodge  in  Torino  where  we  will  be  profiling  our  country  and 
our  region,  and  that’s  the  kind  of  thing  that  you  can  do—just  as 
picking  up  Carl’s  2002  ten-point  plan,  picking  up  some  of  the 
things  that  we’re  doing  and  coming  along,  and  we  have  so  much 
to learn and share with you. 

So thank you for the offer, and I welcome it. 
Senator  SMITH.  Well,  you  know  these  players,  and  if  there  are 
things that we can do in Oregon to be helpful, we would like to do 
so. 

And  if  there’s  anything  that  the  Federal  Government  in  Wash-
ington D.C. can do to be helpful, please know that as one of its offi-
cials, I’m anxious to hear from you and to respond to concerns you 
have  in  ways  that  we  can  help  facilitate  the  success  that  we  hope 
comes  your  way  and  provides  for  the  security  and  the  efficiency 
that I think are really at the heart of this being a success. 

And  I  make  that  offer,  and  I’ll  share  it  with  the  Subcommittee. 
They  can  push  the  buttons—the  right  kind  of  buttons  that  good 
neighbors ought to be providing to one another. 

So  to  each  of  you,  my  heartfelt  thanks  for  coming  here,  your  in-
terest in this, and helping me to focus Oregon and the Federal Gov-
ernment on this state, this region, and this opportunity to highlight 
one of the loveliest places on earth, which is the Pacific Northwest. 

And we conclude with that expression of thanks. 
We’re adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:15 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.]

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  08:05 Jul 17, 2006 Jkt 028349 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\28349.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

